District of Columbia statutes.
3-322

Authorization of Secretary of Interior.

The Secretary of the Interior is authorized and directed to acquire by gift, purchase, condemnation, or otherwise, all real property within the boundaries of the East Capitol Street site, as established in the 1st paragraph under the heading “(2) East Capitol Street Site” contained in the National Capital Planning Commission report entitled “Preliminary Report on Sites for National Memorial Stadium” dated November 8, 1956, and thereafter, acting under authority of the Act entitled “An Act to establish a National Park Service, and for other purposes,” approved August 25, 1916, as amended (16 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.), the Secretary of the Interior shall enter into a contract with the Board for the construction, maintenance, and operation of the Stadium (including the operation and maintenance of motor vehicle parking areas) on such East Capitol Street site, except that such contract may be for a term of not more than 30 years. The Secretary of the Interior is authorized and directed to construct and prepare in areas A, C, D, and E only, on such site, as such areas are indicated on National Capital Parks Map No. 1.7-146, motor vehicle parking areas, including driveways, walks, lighting, and landscaping, at a total cost not to exceed $2,660,000.

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 619, Pub. L. 85-300, § 3
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 421, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(3)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 1(2), (3)

History

1981 Ed., § 2-322.
1973 Ed., § 2-1721.

Prior Codifications

See note to § 3-321.

Transfer of Functions

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.

Editor's Notes